Utah statutes.
41-1a-801.   Altered or changed identification number -- State assigned identification number.

(1)  The owner of a vehicle required to be registered  under this chapter, the identification number of which has been altered, removed, defaced, or has not been placed on it shall make application in the form prescribed by the division for a state assigned identification number.

(2)  The owner shall furnish  information that will satisfy the division that he is the owner of the vehicle and furnish information to identify the vehicle with the registration of the vehicle for the current year, at which time the division shall assign a  state identification number for the vehicle.

(3)  A record of state assigned numbers shall be maintained by the division.

(4)  The state assigned identification number is the identification number of the vehicle when:

(a)  the owner  has stamped the state assigned identification number upon the vehicle as directed by the division;

(b)  a qualified identification number inspector has inspected and found the state assigned identification number stamped upon the vehicle as directed;

(c)  the owner has provided the division with a certificate of inspection; and

(d)  the owner has submitted an application for a certificate of title.

